California statutes. Financial Code
(d) That the sale will be fair, just, and equitable. For purposes of this subdivision, in the case of any term of the sale that has been determined by agreement between the seller and the purchaser in an arm’s-length transaction, the commissioner shall find that the term is fair, just, and equitable to the seller and the purchaser.

(e) That the sale will not have a seriously adverse effect on the safety or soundness of the seller.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application for approval of the sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 499.4.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4878.05.

After an application for approval of a sale has been approved by the commissioner and all conditions precedent to the sale have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall approve the agreement of sale and endorse the approval on the original or a copy of the agreement of sale. The sale shall become effective for all purposes at that time, except that, if the law of the purchaser’s domicile provides for the sale to become effective at a later time, it shall become effective at the later time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 499.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4878.06.

A sale shall have the same effect as provided in Sections 4879.14 and 4879.15 in the case of a sale of the type defined in Section 4879.01.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 35.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4878.07.

(a) In case a seller is a California state commercial bank and sells all of its trust business in a sale:

(1) As of the time when the sale becomes effective, the commissioner shall issue to the seller certificates of authority authorizing it to transact commercial banking business in replacement of the certificates of authority that the seller is required to surrender pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) Promptly after the sale becomes effective, the seller shall surrender to the commissioner for cancellation its certificates of authority authorizing it to transact commercial banking business and trust business and shall file with the commissioner any report of the sale that the commissioner may require.

(b) In any other case, promptly after the sale becomes effective, the seller shall:

(1) Surrender to the commissioner for cancellation the certificate of authority or license for any office closed as a result of the sale.

(2) File with the commissioner any report of the sale that the commissioner may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 499.6.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4878.08.

(a) After a sale becomes effective, the seller or purchaser may issue an officers’ certificate stating that the seller sold a partial trust business unit to the purchaser, describing the business unit, and specifying the time at which the sale became effective.

(b) Any certificate issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be prima facie evidence of the fact of the sale and of the regularity of the proceedings taken for the sale and shall be conclusive evidence of the matters
 in favor of any innocent purchaser or encumbrancer for value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 35.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Other Sales of Partial Business Units [4879.01. - 4879.17.]

4879.01.

In this article, unless the context otherwise requires, “sale” means any of the sales described in Section 4879.02.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 500.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.02.

With the approval of the commissioner:

(a) A bank may sell a partial business unit to a California state bank pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the seller is a national banking association or a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank, federal law, (3) in case the seller is a foreign bank, the law of the foreign bank’s domicile, and (4) in case the partial business unit is located outside this state, the law of the place where the partial business unit is located.

(b) A California state bank may sell a partial business unit to another California state bank, a national banking association, or an insured foreign (other state) state bank, pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the purchaser is a national banking association, federal law, (3) in case the purchaser is an insured foreign (other state) state bank, the law of the foreign bank’s domicile, and (4) in case the partial business unit is located outside this state, the law of the place where the partial business unit is located. However, this subdivision does not apply to any sale of the type defined in Section 4877.01.

(c) A California state bank may sell a partial business unit located outside this state to a foreign (other nation) bank pursuant to (1) this article, (2) the law of the foreign bank’s domicile, and (3) the law of the place where the partial business unit is located.

(d) An industrial loan company may sell a partial business unit to a California industrial loan company pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the seller is a foreign (other state) industrial loan company, the law of the foreign industrial loan company’s domicile, and (3) in case the partial business unit is located outside this state, the law of the place where the partial business unit is located.

(e) A California industrial loan company may sell a partial business unit to an insured industrial loan company pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the purchaser is an insured foreign (other state) industrial loan company, the law of the foreign industrial loan company’s domicile, and (3) in case the partial business unit is located outside this state, the law of the place where the partial business unit is located. However, this subdivision does not apply to any sale of the type
 defined in Section 4877.01.

(f) A depository corporation of any class may sell a partial business unit to a California state depository corporation of another class pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the seller is a federal depository corporation, federal law, (3) in case the seller is a foreign (other state) state depository corporation or foreign (other nation) depository corporation, the law of the foreign depository corporation’s domicile, and (4) in case the partial business unit is located outside this state, the law of the place where the partial business unit is located.

(g) A California state depository corporation of any class may sell a partial business unit to a federal depository corporation of another class or an insured foreign (other state) state depository corporation of another class pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the purchaser is a federal
 depository corporation, federal law, (3) in case the purchaser is an insured foreign (other state) state depository corporation, the law of the foreign depository corporation’s domicile, and (4) in case the partial business unit is located outside this state, the law of the place where the partial business unit is located. However, this subdivision does not apply to any sale of the type defined in Section 4877.01.

(h) A depository corporation may sell a partial business unit located in this state to a California state-licensed foreign (other nation) bank pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the seller is a federal depository corporation or a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank, federal law, (3) in case the seller is a foreign depository corporation, the law of the foreign depository corporation’s domicile, and (4) the law of the purchaser’s domicile.

(i) A California state-licensed foreign (other nation) bank may sell a partial business unit located in this state to a California state depository corporation, a federal depository corporation, an insured foreign (other state) state depository corporation, another California state-licensed foreign (other nation) bank, or a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the purchaser is a federal depository corporation or a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank, federal law, (3) in case the purchaser is a foreign depository corporation, the law of the foreign depository corporation’s domicile, and (4) the law of the seller’s domicile.

(j) A California state depository corporation may sell a partial business unit located in this state to a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank pursuant to (1) this article, (2) federal law, and (3) the law of
 the purchaser’s domicile.

(k) A California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank may sell a partial business unit located in this state to a California state depository corporation pursuant to (1) this article, (2) federal law, and (3) the law of the seller’s domicile.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 501.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.03.

A seller and purchaser shall make an agreement of sale, providing:

(a) That the seller shall sell to the purchaser, and the purchaser shall purchase from the seller, a partial business unit, describing it.

(b) Other provisions as may be appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 155.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.04.

The agreement of sale shall be approved by the seller and purchaser, as follows:

(a) In the case of a California state depository corporation:

(1) If, as of the time when the agreement of sale is made, the deposits, if any, of the partial business unit are less than 10 percent of the total deposits of the state depository corporation and the fiduciary assets, if any, of the partial business unit are less than 10 percent of the
 total fiduciary assets of the state depository corporation, the agreement of sale shall be approved by the board of the state depository corporation.

(2) Otherwise, the agreement of sale shall be approved by the board of the state depository corporation, and the principal terms of the agreement of sale shall be approved by the outstanding shares of the state depository corporation.

(3) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2):

(A) The amount of deposits shall be determined as of the end of the calendar quarter immediately preceding the making of the agreement of sale.

(B) The value of fiduciary assets shall be the net carrying value, as determined in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles, as of the end of the calendar quarter
 immediately preceding the making of the agreement of sale.

(b) In the case of a depository corporation other than a California state depository corporation, the agreement of sale shall be approved as required by the law of the depository corporation’s domicile.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 155.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.05.

(a) Any amendment to an agreement of sale shall be approved by the seller and purchaser, as follows:

(1) In the case of a California state depository corporation, by the board of the corporation, and, if the principal terms of the agreement of sale were required to be approved by the outstanding shares of the corporation under Section 4879.04 and if the amendment changes any of the principal terms of the agreement of sale, by the outstanding shares of the corporation.

(2) In the case of a depository corporation other than a California state depository corporation, as required by the law of the depository corporation’s domicile.

(b) If an agreement of sale is amended and if the amendment is approved as required by subdivision (a), the agreement of sale, as thus amended, constitutes the agreement of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 155.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.06.

In the case of a seller or purchaser that is a California state depository corporation, any approval of the outstanding shares of the corporation required by Section 4879.04 or 4879.05 may be given before or after the approval of the board of the depository corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 155.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.07.

In obtaining any approval of outstanding shares required for an agreement of sale, a purchaser or seller that is a California state depository corporation and, in any case where the purchaser is a California state depository corporation that is to issue securities in consideration of the sale, the seller shall each provide to its shareholders information as the commissioner may require. In determining the information to be required, the commissioner shall give due consideration to regulations relating to proxy statements issued under Section 14 of the
 Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 78n) by (a) the Securities and Exchange Commission, (b) in the case of a depository corporation that is a bank, the federal bank regulatory agencies, and (c) in the case of a depository corporation that is a savings association, the Office of Thrift Supervision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 502.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.08.

A purchaser or seller that is a California state depository corporation, with the approval or its board and without further approval of the outstanding shares, may, and any other purchaser or seller, with approval as may be required under the law of its domicile, may, in its discretion, abandon the sale at any time before the sale becomes effective, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of other parties, including the seller or purchaser, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 155.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.09.

A purchaser or seller that is a California state depository corporation or California state-licensed foreign (other nation) bank, shall file the following with the commissioner:

(a) A copy of the agreement of sale.

(b) An officers’ certificate of the purchaser, certifying that the agreement of sale has been approved by the purchaser as required by Sections 4879.04 and 4879.05.

(c) An officers’ certificate of the seller, certifying that the agreement of sale has been approved by the seller as required by Sections 4879.04 and 4879.05.

(d) An application for approval of the sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 503.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.10.

(a) In case the purchaser is either, and the seller is not either, a California state depository corporation or California state-licensed foreign (other nation) bank, if the commissioner finds all of the following with respect to an application for approval of a sale, he or she shall approve the application:

(1) That the sale will not result in a monopoly and will not be in furtherance of any combination or conspiracy to monopolize or to attempt to monopolize the
 banking, savings association, or industrial loan business in any part of this state.

(2) That the sale will not have the effect in any section of this state of substantially lessening competition, tending to create a monopoly, or otherwise being in restraint of trade, or that the anticompetitive effect is clearly outweighed in the public interest by the probable effect of the sale in meeting the convenience and needs of the community to be served.

(3) That the shareholders’ equity of the purchaser will be adequate and that the financial condition of the purchaser will be satisfactory.

(4) That the directors and executive officers of the purchaser will be satisfactory.

(5) That the purchaser will afford reasonable promise of successful operation and that
 it is reasonable to believe that the purchaser will be operated in a safe and sound manner and in compliance with all applicable laws.

(6) That the sale will be fair, just, and equitable. For purposes of this paragraph, in the case of any term of the sale that has been determined by agreement between the seller and the purchaser in an arm’s length transaction, the commissioner shall find that the term is fair, just, and equitable to the seller and the purchaser.

(7) In the case of a sale where the seller is a California savings association, that the sale will not have a seriously adverse effect on the total availability of financing for housing in any market area of the seller in this state or that any effect of that type is clearly outweighed in the public interest by the probable effect of the sale in meeting the convenience and needs of the community to be served. Nothing in
 this subdivision authorizes the commissioner to require the purchaser to make financing for housing available.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, he or she shall deny the application for approval of the sale.

(b) In case the seller is either, and the purchaser is not either, a California state depository corporation or a California state-licensed foreign (other nation) bank, if the commissioner finds all of the following with respect to an application for approval of a sale, he or she shall approve the application:

(1) That the sale will not have a seriously adverse effect on the safety or soundness of the seller.

(2) That the sale will be fair, just, and equitable. For purposes of this subdivision, in the case of any term of the sale that has been determined by agreement
 between the seller and the purchaser in an arm’s length transaction, the commissioner shall find that the term is fair, just, and equitable to the seller and the purchaser.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, he or she shall deny the application for approval of the sale.

(c) In case the seller and the purchaser are each either a California state depository corporation or a California state depository corporation or a California state-licensed foreign (other nation) bank, if the commissioner finds all of the factors set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) with respect to an application for approval of a sale, the commissioner shall approve the application. If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 504.1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.11.

After an application for approval of a sale has been approved by the commissioner and all conditions precedent to the sale have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall approve the agreement of sale and endorse the approval on the original or a copy of the agreement of sale, and at that time the sale shall become effective for all purposes.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4879.12 by Stats. 2003, Ch. 404, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.12.

When a sale becomes effective, in case the purchaser is a California state depository corporation or California state-licensed foreign (other nation) bank:

(a) Unless the purchaser provided otherwise in the application for approval of the sale or unless the commissioner provided otherwise in the approval of the application:

(1) The purchaser may establish equivalent offices at any branch offices, places of business,
 extensions of offices, and other facilities of the seller transferred in the sale.

(2) If the seller was authorized to transact trust business and if the partial business unit sold includes any trust business, the purchaser, if it is a California state bank or savings association, may transact trust business.

(b) The commissioner shall issue to the purchaser certificates of authority, licenses, and other authorizations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4879.13 by Stats. 2003, Ch. 404, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.13.

In case a seller is a California state commercial bank and sells all of its trust business in a sale:

(a) As of the time when the sale becomes effective, the commissioner shall issue to the seller certificates of authority authorizing it to transact commercial banking business in replacement of the certificates of authority that the seller is required to surrender pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) Promptly after the
 sale becomes effective, the seller shall surrender to the commissioner for cancellation its certificates of authority authorizing it to transact commercial banking business and trust business.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4879.135 by Stats. 2003, Ch. 404, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.14.

When a sale becomes effective:

(a) The purchaser shall succeed, without other transfer, to all rights and property of the seller which are sold to the purchaser under the agreement of sale.

(b) The purchaser shall assume in the same manner as if the purchaser had itself incurred such debts and liabilities, and shall be subject to, all debts and liabilities of the seller transferred to the purchaser under the agreement of sale.

(c) All rights of creditors of the seller and all liens upon the property of the seller shall be preserved unimpaired.

(d) Any action or proceeding pending by or against the seller which was sold or transferred to the purchaser under the agreement of sale may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the purchaser, or the purchaser may be proceeded against or substituted in place of the seller.

(e) (1) In case the partial business unit sold includes trust business, the purchaser shall succeed, without further transfer, to the rights, obligations, properties, assets, investments, deposits, demands, agreements, and trusts of the seller under all trusts, executorships, administrations, guardianships, agencies, and all other fiduciary or representative capacities sold to the purchaser under the
 agreement of sale, to the same extent as if the purchaser had originally assumed the fiduciary or representative capacities.

(2) In case the partial business unit sold constitutes all or substantially all the trust business of the seller, the purchaser shall, in addition, be entitled to take and execute the appointment to all executorships, trusteeships, guardianships, and other fiduciary or representative capacities to which the seller is or may be named in wills, whenever probated, or to which the seller is or may be named or appointed by any other instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 155.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.15.

No action on account of any debt or liability assumed by a purchaser in a sale may be commenced against the seller more than one year after the time when the sale becomes effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 155.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.16.

Promptly after a sale becomes effective, the seller shall:

(a) Surrender to its regulator for cancellation the certificates of authority or licenses issued to it by the regulator that relate to the partial business unit sold.

(b) File with its regulator any report regarding the sale that the regulator may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 155.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4879.17.

(a) After a sale becomes effective, the commissioner shall issue, upon application, a certificate under his or her official seal, stating that the seller sold a partial business unit to the purchaser, describing the business unit, and specifying the time at which the sale became effective.

(b) Any certificate pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be prima facie evidence of the fact of the sale and of the regularity of the proceedings taken for the sale and shall be conclusive
 evidence of the matters in favor of any innocent purchaser or encumbrancer for value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 508.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Merger [4880. - 4908.10.]



  ARTICLE 1. Merger Into California State Depository Corporation [4880. - 4891.]

4880.

In this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) “Agreement of merger” includes a certificate of ownership executed pursuant to Section 1110 of the Corporations Code.

(b) “Merger” means any of the mergers described in Section 4881.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 509.1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4881.

(a) With the approval of the commissioner, a bank may merge into a California state bank pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the disappearing bank is a national banking association or a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank, federal law, and (3) in case the disappearing bank is a foreign bank, the law of the foreign bank’s domicile.

(b) With the approval of the commissioner, an industrial loan company may merge into a California industrial loan
 company pursuant to (1) this article and (2) in case the disappearing industrial loan company is a foreign (other state) industrial loan company, the law of the foreign industrial loan company’s domicile.

(c) With the approval of the commissioner, a depository corporation of any class may merge into a California state depository corporation of another class pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the disappearing depository corporation is a federal depository corporation or a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank, federal law, and (3) in case the disappearing depository corporation is a foreign depository corporation, the law of the disappearing depository corporation’s domicile.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 510.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4882.

In obtaining any approval of outstanding shares required for a merger, the surviving depository corporation and, in case the surviving depository corporation is to issue securities in consideration of the merger, the disappearing depository corporation shall each provide to its shareholders such information as the commissioner may require. In determining the information to be required, the commissioner shall give due consideration to regulations relating to proxy statements issued under Section 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 78n) by
 (a) the Securities and Exchange Commission, (b) in the case of a depository corporation that is a bank, the federal bank regulatory agencies, and (c) in the case of a depository corporation that is a savings association, the Office of Thrift Supervision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 511.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4883.

The provisions of Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code shall not apply to the shareholders of the surviving depository corporation in a merger.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1411, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4884.

A surviving depository corporation shall file with the commissioner an application for approval of the merger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 512.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4885.

If the commissioner finds all of the following with respect to an application for approval of a merger, the commissioner shall approve the application:

(a) That the merger will not result in a monopoly and will not be in furtherance of any combination or conspiracy to monopolize or to attempt to monopolize the banking, savings association, or industrial loan business in any part of this state.

(b) That the merger will not have the
 effect in any section of this state of substantially lessening competition, tending to create a monopoly, or otherwise being in restraint of trade, or that the anticompetitive effect is clearly outweighed in the public interest by the probable effect of the merger in meeting the convenience and needs of the community to be served.

(c) That the shareholders’ equity of the surviving depository corporation will be adequate and that the financial condition of the surviving depository corporation will be satisfactory.

(d) That the directors and executive officers of the surviving depository corporation will be satisfactory.

(e) That the surviving depository corporation will afford reasonable promise of successful operation and that it is reasonable to believe that the surviving depository corporation will be operated in a
 safe and sound manner and in compliance with all applicable laws.

(f) That the merger will be fair, just, and equitable. For purposes of this subdivision, in the case of any term of the merger that has been determined by agreement between the disappearing depository corporation and the surviving depository corporation in an arm’s length transaction, the commissioner shall find that the term is fair, just, and equitable to the disappearing depository corporation and the surviving depository corporation.

(g) In the case of a merger where the disappearing depository corporation is a California savings association, that the merger will not have a seriously adverse effect on the total availability of financing for housing in any market area of the disappearing savings association in this state or that any effect of that type is clearly outweighed in the public interest by the probable
 effect of the merger in meeting the convenience and needs of the community to be served. Nothing in this subdivision authorizes the commissioner to require the surviving depository corporation to make financing for housing available.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application for approval of the merger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 513.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4887.

(a) After an application for approval of a merger has been approved and all conditions precedent to the merger have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall approve the agreement of merger and endorse the approval on the agreement of merger.

(b) After the agreement of merger has been filed with the Secretary of State, the surviving depository corporation shall file with the commissioner a copy of the agreement of merger certified by the Secretary of State, and at that time the
 merger shall become effective for all purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 515.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4888.

When a merger becomes effective:

(a) Unless the surviving depository corporation provided otherwise in the application for approval of the merger or unless the commissioner provided otherwise in the approval of the application:

(1) The surviving depository corporation may establish and maintain a branch office at the head office of the disappearing depository corporation and may establish and maintain equivalent offices at the
 branch offices, places of business, extensions of offices, and other facilities, if any, of the disappearing corporation.

(2) If the disappearing depository corporation was authorized to transact and was transacting trust business, the surviving depository corporation, if it is a California state bank or savings association, may transact trust business.

(b) The commissioner shall issue to the surviving depository corporation certificates of authority, licenses, and other authorizations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 516.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4889.

(a) When a merger becomes effective:

(1) Any reference to the disappearing depository corporation in any writing, whether executed or taking effect before or after the merger, shall be deemed a reference to the surviving corporation, if not inconsistent with the other provisions of the writing.

(2) In case the disappearing depository corporation was transacting trust business, the surviving depository corporation shall succeed, without further transfer, to the rights, obligations, properties, assets,
 investments, deposits, demands, agreements, and trusts of the disappearing depository corporation under all trusts, executorships, administrations, guardianships, agencies, and all their fiduciary or representative capacities to the same extent as if the surviving depository corporation had originally assumed such fiduciary or representative capacities, and the surviving depository corporation shall be entitled to take and execute the appointment to all executorships, trusteeships, guardianships, and other fiduciary or representative capacities to which the disappearing depository corporation is or may be named in wills, whenever probated, or to which the disappearing depository corporation is or may be named or appointed by any other instrument.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall be construed as clarifying and amplifying, not as limiting or restricting, the provisions of Section 1107 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1411, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4890.

Promptly after a merger becomes effective:

(a) The surviving depository corporation shall:

(1) Surrender to the regulator of the disappearing depository corporation for cancellation the certificates of authority or licenses issued to the disappearing depository corporation by the regulator; and

(2) File with the regulator of the disappearing depository corporation such
 report regarding the merger as the regulator may require.

(b) The commissioner shall file a report regarding the merger with the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 517.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4891.

(a) After a merger becomes effective, the commissioner shall, upon application, issue a certificate under his or her official seal, stating that the disappearing depository corporation merged into the surviving depository corporation and specifying the time at which the merger became effective.

(b) Any certificate issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be prima facie evidence of the fact of the merger and of the regularity of the proceedings taken for the merger and shall
 be conclusive evidence of such matters in favor of any innocent purchaser or encumbrancer for value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 518.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Merger Into California State-Licensed Foreign (Other Nation) Bank [4895.01. - 4895.06.]

4895.01.

In this article, unless the context otherwise requires, “merger” means any of the mergers described in Section 4895.02.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 164.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4895.02.

With the approval of the commissioner:

(a) A California depository corporation may merge into a California state-licensed foreign (other nation) bank pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the disappearing depository corporation is a federal depository corporation, federal law, and (3) the law of the foreign bank’s domicile.

(b) A foreign (other state) depository corporation that has a branch office in this state may merge
 into a California state-licensed foreign (other nation) bank pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the disappearing depository corporation is a federal depository corporation, federal law, and (3) the laws of the domiciles of the disappearing depository corporation and of the foreign bank.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 519.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4895.03.

In case the disappearing depository corporation is a California state depository corporation, a merger is subject to the provisions of Section 1108 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 164.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4895.04.

(a) In case the disappearing depository corporation is a California state depository corporation, a merger has the same effect as provided in Section 1107 of the Corporations Code and Section 4889 in the case of a merger of the type defined in Section 4880.

(b) In case the disappearing depository corporation is not a California state depository corporation, a merger has the same effect with respect to the disappearing corporation’s business in this state as provided in
 Section 1107 of the Corporations Code and Section 4889 in the case of a merger of the type defined in Section 4880.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 164.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4895.05.

(a) A merger shall not become effective unless it has been approved by the commissioner.

(b) After an application for approval of a merger has been approved and all conditions precedent to the merger have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall approve the merger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 520.1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4895.06.

A merger is subject to the provisions of Sections 4884 to 4885, inclusive, and 4888 to 4891, inclusive, as if the merger were a merger of the type defined in Section 4880.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 43.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Merger Into Federal Depository Corporation, California Federally Licensed Foreign (Other Nation) Bank, or Insured Foreign (Other State) State Depository Corporation [4900. - 4905.]

4900.

In this article, unless the context otherwise requires, “merger” means any of the mergers described in Section 4901.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 166.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4901.

(a) A California state bank may merge into a national banking association, a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank, or an insured foreign (other state) state bank pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the surviving bank is a national banking association or a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank, federal law, and (3) in case the surviving bank is a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank or an insured foreign (other state) state bank, the law of the foreign bank’s domicile.

(b) A California industrial loan company may merge into an insured foreign (other state) industrial loan company pursuant to (1) this article and (2) the law of the foreign industrial loan company’s domicile.
